lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/sju-x-1743.twolc
! compile with make -f hi

Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 
%^EA:0 
%>:0
;

Sets
Vow = a e o u i ;


Rules

"Delete e in front of i suffix"
e:0 <=> _ %>:0 i ;

"e to a in front of illative i"
e:a <=> _ %^EA: %>:0 i ;

"tj to ts in final position"
j:s <=> t _ .#. ;
